Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4
S

TONE MOUNTAIN MEMORIAL ASSOCIATION

Cross references.

- Prohibition against selling real property,

§

50-16-3.1

.

12-3-190. Short title.

This part may be cited as the "Stone Mountain Memorial Association Act."

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 1.)

12-3-191. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Association" means the Stone Mountain Memorial Association created by this part or any authority or body in which the duties and liabilities of the association created hereby may hereafter become vested.

"Bonds" or "revenue bonds" means any bonds issued by the association under this part, including refunding bonds.

"Cost of project" means the cost of acquiring, constructing, developing, improving, equipping, adding to, extending, remodeling, managing, and operating the project or any part thereof, including, without being limited to, the cost of all lands, properties, franchises, easements, and rights in property; the cost of all machinery and equipment necessary for constructing, improving, developing, adding to, remodeling, managing, maintaining, and operating the project; financing charges and interest accruing on any bonds issued by the association prior to and during the period estimated as necessary to complete the construction, development, and improvement of the project, and for one year thereafter; the cost of plans and specifications; the cost of engineering, engineers, and architects; legal fees; other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicality of the project or any part thereof; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized by this part, including fiscal agents' fees and the estimated cost of operating the project for a period not exceeding 12 months, and the expense of construction, development, improvement, management, maintenance, operation, or any other action permitted by this part with respect to the project and the placing of the same in operation, and including any other expense authorized by this part to be incurred by the association which is incurred with respect to any action as regards the project. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds issued under this part for such project.

"Governing authority of a county" means the commissioner, board of commissioners, commission, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any county.

"Governing authority of a municipality" means the council, board of aldermen, or other person or body of persons at the time entrusted by law with the administration of the fiscal affairs of any municipal corporation.

"Master plan" means that document created by Robert and Company and adopted by the association in December, 1992, consisting of districts and plans for various construction projects as amended prior to January 1, 1995, and as it may be amended from time to time pursuant to Code Section 12-3-194.2.

"Project" means Stone Mountain and property adjacent thereto acquired by the association and all accommodations, utilities, facilities, services, and equipment necessary or convenient, and all property, real, personal, or mixed, used or useful, including franchises and easements, in constructing, erecting, improving, remodeling, developing, equipping, adding to, extending, maintaining, managing, and operating Stone Mountain, located in DeKalb County, Georgia, and property adjacent thereto, as a Confederate memorial and public recreational area, and the construction, improvement, development, maintenance, management, operation, and extension of any part thereof, as to which the association has undertaken or agreed to undertake any action permitted by this part.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 357, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 3.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, former paragraphs (4) and (5) were redesignated as present paragraphs (5) and (4), respectively, to alphabetize the definitions.

12-3-192. Creation of association.

There is created a body corporate and politic and instrumentality and public corporation of this state to be known as the Stone Mountain Memorial Association. It shall have perpetual existence. In such name it may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts.

The association is assigned to the Department of Natural Resources for administrative purposes only.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1520.)

Cross references.

- Effect of assignment for administrative purposes,

§

50-4-3

.

12-3-192.1. Purposes of association.

The purposes of the Stone Mountain Memorial Association shall include:

To preserve the natural areas situated within the Stone Mountain Park area;

To provide access to Stone Mountain for Georgia's citizens; and

To maintain an appropriate and suitable memorial for the Confederacy.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-192.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 160, § 1.)

12-3-193. Members of association; terms; vacancies; officers; bylaws; quorum; reimbursement for expenses; compensation of employees; books and records.

The association shall be composed of the commissioner of natural resources or his or her designee and eight members to be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a resident of the metropolitan Atlanta area. The members appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for terms of four years, with the beginning and ending dates of terms to be specified by the Governor, and until the appointment and qualification of their successors, except that the fourth member to be appointed by the Governor as provided for in this part shall be appointed for an initial term of three years and until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor, and except that the members of the association appointed by the Governor and in office on July 1, 1978, shall continue in office until the expiration of the terms for which they were appointed and until the appointment and qualification of their successors, and except that the fifth member to be appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for an initial term beginning July 1, 1985, and ending December 31, 1987, and until the appointment and qualification of a successor. Appointments by the Governor to fill vacancies on the association shall be made for the unexpired term.

The Governor shall appoint the chairperson of the association for a term of one year from among the members of the association which the Governor appoints. A member may serve no more than two consecutive terms as chairperson nor more than two terms as chairperson in any one four-year term as a member of the association. The association shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be members. The office of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one person.

The association may make such bylaws for its government as is deemed necessary but is under no duty to do so.

Any five members of the association shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted to the association by this part. No vacancy on the association shall impair the right of a quorum to transact any and all business as aforesaid.

The members shall receive no compensation for their services, but all members shall be entitled to be reimbursed for actual expenses, including travel and any other expenses, incurred while in the performance of their duties. Employees of the association shall receive reasonable compensation, to be determined by the members of the association, for their services.

Members of the association shall be accountable as trustees. They shall cause to be kept adequate books and records of all transactions of the association, including records of income and disbursements of every nature. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once in each year.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2041, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 465, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 872, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1690, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 4.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, a hyphen was inserted between "four" and "year" in the second sentence of subsection (b).

12-3-194. Powers of association generally.

The association shall have, in addition to any other powers conferred in this part, the following powers:

To have a seal and alter it at its pleasure;

To acquire Stone Mountain and such surrounding area as the association may deem necessary for the proper development, management, preservation, and protection of Stone Mountain, by purchase from the owner or owners thereof, and to pay therefor such price as may be agreed upon;

To acquire, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to hold, lease, and dispose of, in any manner, real and personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes; provided, however, that as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 50-16-3.1, no real property may be sold unless necessary for a public road right of way;

To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the association, as the association deems advisable, and to employ such experts, agents, and employees as may be in its judgment necessary to carry on properly the business of the association; to fix the compensation for such officers, experts, agents, and employees and to promote and discharge same; provided, however, that all legal services for the association except legal services in validating and approving bonds authorized by this part shall be rendered by the Attorney General and his staff and no fee shall be paid to any attorney or law firm for legal services within or outside the State of Georgia, except for validating and approving such bonds. The association shall have authority to pay such federal fees, stamps, and all licenses, together with any court costs that may be incurred by virtue of the powers granted by this part;

To make such contracts and agreements as the legitimate and necessary purposes of this part shall require and to make all other contracts and agreements as may be necessary or convenient in the management of the affairs of the association or in the operation of the project, including, but not limited to, any lease of the project or any part thereof, and any contract with respect to the use of the property or any part thereof for concessions, services, or accommodations to be offered to the public within the project area. Any and all persons, firms, and corporations, including any public officer or agency, are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the association upon such terms and for such purposes as may be deemed advisable;

To construct, reconstruct, lay out, repair, develop, improve, maintain, equip, manage, and operate the project as defined in Code Section 12-3-191, the cost of any such action to be paid in whole or in part from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the association; provided, however, that:

The association shall not undertake any such activity having a projected cost of over $1 million unless it has first evaluated the feasibility of involving private persons or entities in the development, construction, operation, and management of the project, including the proposed activities, and has filed a copy of such evaluation with the Office of Planning and Budget and with the Recreational Authorities Overview Committee; and

Except as contained in the master plan as it existed on January 1, 1995, no development shall occur within the bounds of the natural district. The venues for the 1996 Summer Olympic Games for archery and for the velodrome shall be removed at the completion of the Olympic Games and the grounds returned to an undeveloped state. After the removal of such construction, only construction contained in the master plan as it existed on January 1, 1995, may take place in the natural district except as the master plan may be amended in accordance with Code Section 12-3-194.2;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to issue bonds and other evidence of indebtedness for such purposes as provided in this part;

To pledge to the payment of its bonds any property or revenues derived therefrom;

To establish rates, tolls, fees, and charges for its facilities and services, including fees or charges for access to the memorial, and to alter such rates and charges, and to collect and enforce collection of the same; provided, however, that the association shall be a nonprofit organization, and such rates, tolls, fees, and charges shall be only sufficient to produce funds necessary to construct, reconstruct, develop, improve, equip, manage, and operate the project and to pay the principal of and the interest on obligations of the association and expenses in connection therewith and to create reserves therefrom for the purpose of adding to, extending, improving, and equipping the project;

To exercise any power which may be granted or authorized to be granted to private corporations, not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state nor with the other provisions of this part;

To prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of the project, should the association deem such rules and regulations necessary;

To do and perform all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred upon the association;

To make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, removal, and relocation of pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, poles, towers, tracts, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility in, on, along, over, or under the project or any part thereof; and

To sell, upon obtaining a license from the Department of Revenue, alcoholic beverages, as defined in Title 3, at any motel, hotel, restaurant, coliseum area, or convention center of the association and at any group or meeting function closed to the general public and for which services are provided by contract with the association within or upon property or facilities owned, operated, used, or controlled by the Stone Mountain Memorial Association, but no licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages for carry-out purposes shall be issued.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 5; Ga. L. 1959, p. 333, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1982, p. 804, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 9; Ga. L. 1988, p. 218, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1781, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 5; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, "$1 million" was substituted for "$1,000,000.00" in subparagraph (6)(A).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, in paragraph (6), a comma was inserted between "provided" and "however" in the introductory language and a semicolon was substituted for the period at the end of subparagraph (6)(B).

12-3-194.1. Police and legislative powers of association; appointment of peace officers; jurisdiction and venue of park offenses; sale of confederate memorabilia.

The association is empowered to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all user and personal conduct restrictions upon the properties and facilities and the persons under its jurisdiction to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the nation and the state.

In addition to the powers provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the association is empowered to exercise the police powers of the state in an area extending not more than 500 yards from the park boundaries adjacent to the entrances and exits, other than entrances or exits adjacent to the corporate limits of a municipality, which are used regularly by patrons attending functions at Stone Mountain Park and in an area extending not more than 500 yards from the tennis center.

The association shall have legislative power to adopt reasonable ordinances relating to the property, affairs, and administration of Stone Mountain Park for which no provision has been made by general law and which are not inconsistent with the general laws or the Constitution of this state. The association is further authorized to adopt ordinances adopting by reference any or all of the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 40 in accordance with Code Section 40-6-372. Within the limits of Stone Mountain Park and within the area described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the association is authorized to appoint peace officers, who are authorized and empowered to serve and execute warrants and to make arrests for violation of ordinances adopted by the association. Within the limits of Stone Mountain Park and within the area described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, such peace officers shall have the same authority, powers, and privileges regarding enforcement of laws as peace officers employed by county and municipal police departments of this state. Prosecutions for violations of the ordinances of the association shall be upon citation or upon accusation as provided in Code Sections 15-10-62 and 15-10-63. The association may provide that ordinance violations may be tried upon citations with or without a prosecuting attorney as well as upon accusations in the manner prescribed in Code Section 15-10-63.

For purposes of this Code section, the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County shall have jurisdiction and authority to hear and try those offenses occurring within the limits of Stone Mountain Park which violate the ordinances of the association and to punish violations of such ordinances, all in the manner and to the extent prescribed in Article 4 of Chapter 10 of Title 15. The State Court of DeKalb County shall have jurisdiction and authority to hear and try all cases removed from the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County for jury trial by any defendant charged with one or more violations of the ordinances of the association. The Superior Court of DeKalb County shall have jurisdiction to review all convictions by certiorari to the superior court. The jurisdiction and authority of the courts of DeKalb County provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to and not in limitation of the jurisdiction and authority of such courts as may be now or hereafter provided.

The Stone Mountain Memorial Association shall continue the practice of stocking, restocking, and sales of confederate memorabilia.

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 649, § 1; Code 1981, §

12-3-194.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 448, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1178, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in subsection (d), a comma was added following "restocking".

Editor's notes.

- The provisions of subsection (b) which relate to the appointment of security officers were previously enacted in similar form by Ga. L. 1963, p. 649,

§

1, which was not codified in the O.C.G.A. until 1985.

12-3-194.2. Adherence to master plan; survey required; amendment of plan; uses to which natural district may be put.

The association, in the exercise of its authority to develop, manage, preserve, and protect Stone Mountain, shall be guided by and shall adhere to the master plan. That area shown on the master plan as the "natural district" shall be surveyed on or before December 1, 1995, by a Georgia registered engineer or surveyor and that survey, as approved by the association members at a regularly scheduled public meeting of the association, shall become a part of the master plan.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the association may, from time to time, amend the master plan but only in compliance with the following procedure:

Any proposed amendment to the master plan shall be described in written form and, if capable of such description, in visual form and presented publicly at a regular meeting of the association;

A brief summary of the proposed change shall be advertised in the legal organs of DeKalb and Gwinnett counties along with the date on which a meeting of the association shall be held to consider the proposed change. Directions as to the manner of receiving comments from the public, including the time and place of the public hearing on the proposed change required by paragraph (6) of this subsection, shall be provided. Information describing the proposed change and the public hearing also shall be distributed to the media by news release and published in appropriate publications of the association;

The association shall transmit three copies of the summary provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection to the legislative counsel. The copies shall be transmitted at least 30 days prior to the date of the association's intended action. Within three days after receipt of the copies, if possible, the legislative counsel shall furnish the presiding officers of each house with a copy of the summary, and the presiding officers shall assign the summary to the chairperson of the appropriate standing committee in each house for review and provide a copy to any member of that house who makes a standing written request. In the event a presiding officer is unavailable for the purpose of making the assignment within the time limitations, the legislative counsel shall assign the summary to the chairperson of the appropriate standing committee and provide the copies to members of each house who have made standing written requests. The legislative counsel shall also transmit within the time limitations provided in this paragraph a notice of the assignment to the chairperson of the appropriate standing committee;

In the event a standing committee to which a summary is assigned as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection files an objection to a proposed amendment to the master plan with the chairperson of the association prior to its adoption and the association adopts the proposed amendment over the objection, the amendment may be considered by the branch of the General Assembly whose committee objected to its adoption by the introduction of a resolution for the purpose of overriding the amendment at any time within the first 30 days of the next regular session of the General Assembly. It shall be the duty of the association if it adopts a proposed amendment to the master plan over such objection to notify the presiding officers of the Senate and the House of Representatives, the chairpersons of the Senate and House committees to which the summary was referred, and the legislative counsel within ten days after the adoption of the amendment to the master plan. In the event the resolution is adopted by such branch of the General Assembly, it shall be immediately transmitted to the other branch of the General Assembly. It shall be the duty of the presiding officer of the other branch of the General Assembly to have such branch, within five days after the receipt of the resolution, to consider the resolution for the purpose of overriding the amendment to the master plan. In the event the resolution is adopted by two-thirds of the votes of each branch of the General Assembly, the amendment shall be void on the day after the adoption of the resolution by the second branch of the General Assembly. In the event the resolution is ratified by less than two-thirds of the votes of either branch, the resolution shall be submitted to the Governor for his or her approval or veto. In the event of the Governor's veto, the amendment to the master plan shall remain in effect. In the event of the Governor's approval, the amendment to the master plan shall be void on the day after the date of his or her approval;

Any proposed changes to the boundaries of that area delineated on the master plan as the natural district shall be surveyed and marked at least seven days prior to the public hearing required by paragraph (6) of this subsection in such a fashion as to be readily discernible on the ground by members of the public;

A public hearing shall be held no earlier than 15 days after the most recent publication of the notice required by paragraph (2) of this subsection in either the legal organ of DeKalb or Gwinnett County; and

No sooner than 30 days after the meeting of the association at which the proposed change was announced pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the association shall meet and consider in an open and public meeting the proposed change which, if approved, shall become a part of the master plan, subject, however, to the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection.

The properties designated as the natural district on the master plan, as it exists on April 14, 1997, shall be held by the association in trust for the benefit of the present and future generations of the people of the State of Georgia. The natural district shall be put to the designated use or uses which are shown within the master plan as it exists on April 14, 1997, which use or uses are found to confer the best and most important benefit to the public. The natural district shall not be put to any uses other than those shown on the master plan except pursuant to the following procedures:

If the association determines that there may exist an imperative and unavoidable necessity for a use of the natural district other than those uses identified in the master plan, the association shall hold a public hearing thereon in either DeKalb County or Gwinnett County;

The association shall consider fully all testimony relative to the proposed use of the natural district and submit a recommendation to the General Assembly; and

The General Assembly may then determine if such use is in the public interest and may by statute or joint resolution approve such other use of the natural district.

Neither the designation of a piece of property as a part of the natural district nor any action taken by the association pursuant to this Code section shall operate to void, preempt, or dilute any protected status which that property had or would have had but for its inclusion within the natural district.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, the association shall:

Consider in all of its decisions regarding changes to, and implementation of, the master plan the effect of such change or implementation upon the rare plant known as the rock aster, Aster Avitus, growing within Stone Mountain Park; and

Maintain the services of a qualified naturalist to assure that rare and endangered plants within Stone Mountain Park, whether growing inside or outside of the natural areas, are protected.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-194.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 6; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1997, p. 839, § 1.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, "April 14, 1997" was substituted for "the effective date of this subsection" in two places in paragraph (c)(1).

12-3-195. Obligations of state under lease contracts with association; failure or refusal of lessee to perform; assignment of rentals due.

The rentals contracted to be paid by the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state to the association under leases entered upon pursuant to this part shall constitute obligations of the state for the payment of which the good faith of the state is pledged. Such rentals shall be paid as provided in the lease contracts from funds appropriated for such purposes by the terms of the Constitution of Georgia. It shall be the duty of the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state to see to the punctual payment of all such rentals.

In the event of any failure or refusal on the part of lessees punctually to perform any covenant or obligation contained in any lease entered upon pursuant to this part, the association may enforce performance by any legal or equitable process against lessees, and consent is given for the institution of any such action.

The association shall be permitted to assign any rental due it by the lessees to a trustee or paying agent as may be required by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the association.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 22; Ga. L. 1964, p. 357, § 3.)

12-3-196. Condemnation of property for developing Stone Mountain; conveyance of property and rights of way to association; facilities, equipment, and services.

In the event any portion of Stone Mountain proper or of the area surrounding the mountain, which portion or area may be necessary in the opinion of the Governor for use in developing the property, cannot be acquired by purchase, it shall be the duty of the Governor, the state auditor, and the Attorney General to acquire the same by condemnation proceedings, such condemnation proceedings to be subject to the applicable provisions of law relating to the condemnation of property by the State of Georgia. The Governor, the state auditor, and the Attorney General are authorized and directed to proceed to acquire by condemnation, as authorized by such law, and in the way and manner provided by such law, any such portion of the property deemed by the Governor to be necessary for the proper development of Stone Mountain which cannot be acquired by the association by gift or purchase.

The Governor is authorized to convey to the association, on behalf of the state, Stone Mountain and the property adjacent thereto or any interest therein and any rights of way now or hereafter owned by the state. The consideration for such conveyance shall be determined by the Governor and expressed in a deed of conveyance; provided, however, that such consideration shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the state and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration. Upon such conveyance being executed and delivered, all right, power, and authority of any instrumentality, agency, department, or office of the state to possess or improve or otherwise deal with the Stone Mountain property, except as provided by this part, shall terminate.

The governing authority of any county or municipality of this state is authorized and empowered on behalf of such county or municipality to convey to the association any interest of such county or municipality in Stone Mountain and any property adjacent thereto and any rights of way for roads or highways, including such roads and highways traversing any such property, now or hereafter owned by such county or municipality. The consideration for any such conveyance shall be determined by the governing authority of such county or municipality and expressed in a deed of conveyance; provided, however, that such consideration shall be nominal, the benefits flowing to the county or municipality and its citizens constituting full and adequate actual consideration.

The state, any department, board, or agency of the state, and any county or municipality of the state are authorized to furnish to the association any available facilities, machinery, equipment, services, or labor needful or necessary in the improvement of the property of the association, without cost to the association. The expense of any such facilities or services shall be deemed proper and legitimate expenses of the state or of such department, board, agency, county, or municipality.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12.)

Cross references.

- Condemnation procedure generally, T. 22, C. 2.

12-3-197. Transfer of funds to association.

The Governor is authorized and directed to transfer to the association, for use in acquiring Stone Mountain and the surrounding area, any available funds of the state not otherwise appropriated.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 7.)

12-3-198. Location, construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways, roads, streets, and rights of way.

The State Transportation Board is authorized to make such studies and estimates in connection with the location and relocation of highways, roads, streets, and rights of way in connection with the project, whether within or without the project area, as may be necessary to the relocation of any roads, streets, or highways within the property of the association. The board shall, at the expense of the Department of Transportation, relocate such roads, streets, and highways so as to conform to the plan of the association for the development and improvement of the project.

The association may grant rights of way and easements for highways and roads within the project area to the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation is authorized to lay out, construct, improve, and maintain any such roads and rights of way. The cost of any such undertaking shall be deemed to be a proper and legitimate expense of the Department of Transportation.

The State Transportation Board or its successors and the Department of Transportation are empowered to acquire, in any manner permitted by law, real property, any interest therein, or rights of way for the location and relocation of highways and roads located in proximity to the project. The board and the department are authorized to expend any available funds for the purpose of such locating and relocating and for constructing, improving, and maintaining any such highways and roads; and the cost of any such undertaking shall be deemed a proper and legitimate expense of such board or department.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 8.)

12-3-199. Association fund.

All revenues in excess of all obligations of the association of every nature which are not otherwise pledged or restricted as to disposition and use by the terms of any trust indenture entered into by the association for the security of bonds issued under this part, together with all receipts and gifts of every kind and nature whatsoever, shall be and become the association fund.

The association, in its discretion, shall pledge or utilize the association fund for any one or more of the following purposes:

Pledges to the payment of any bond issue requirements, or to sinking or reserve funds, as may be provided for under the terms of this part;

Payment of any outstanding unpaid bond obligations or administrative expenses;

The most advantageous obtainable purchase, redemption, and retirement of the association's bonds pursuant to privileges accorded to the association in the various issues of bonds outstanding;

Investment or reinvestment in any of the following obligations:

Obligations of this state or other states;

Obligations issued by the United States;

Obligations fully insured or guaranteed by a United States government agency;

Obligations of any corporation of the United States;

Prime bankers' acceptances;

The local government investment pool established by Chapter 83 of Title 36, the "Local Government Investment Pool Act";

Repurchase agreements;

Obligations of other political subdivisions of this state; and

After all outstanding bonds or obligations of the association issued to pay the cost of the project or any part thereof have been paid or satisfied by payment redemption and retirement, or otherwise, all revenues from the project in excess of those necessary to maintain, operate, and manage such project (including extensions, renewals, and additions thereto), unless otherwise allocated or pledged as provided in this Code section, shall be paid to the state treasury and become a part of the general funds of the state.

Certificates of deposit;

provided, however, that funds so invested and income from such investments shall always be available to and ultimately expended for other purposes authorized by this chapter.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1864, §§ 1, 2.)

12-3-200. Revenue bonds - Power of association to adopt resolutions providing for and to issue bonds.

The association, or any association, authority, or body which has succeeded or which may in the future succeed to the powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the association, shall have power and is authorized at one time, or from time to time, to issue negotiable bonds in a sum not to exceed $15 million in principal amount outstanding at any one time, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of the project, including the acquisition of the property authorized by paragraph (2) of Code Section 12-3-194 to be acquired by the association, in the event funds for such acquisition do not become available under Code Section 12-3-197. The association shall also have the power to adopt all necessary and appropriate resolutions to provide for the issuance of such negotiable bonds.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 10; Ga. L. 1959, p. 333, § 2; Ga. L. 1964, p. 357, § 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 794, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Revenue bonds generally,

§

36-82-60

et seq.

12-3-201. Revenue bonds - Sale by public competitive bidding; determination of price and rate of interest; dating of bonds; payment of principal and interest; time of maturity.

All bonds of the association shall be sold at public competitive bidding at a price of not less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery, provided that the association may obligate itself to deliver any given issue of bonds to the purchasers thereof within any reasonable period of time after the sale and may pay as a penalty for delay in such delivery such reasonable sums as may be agreed upon in advance in writing with the purchasers. All bonds of the association shall be advertised and offered prior to the fixing of the interest rates thereon; and bids thereon shall be competitive as to the interest rate offered by each bidder, provided that as to any issue of bonds the association may make rules limiting the number of divisions into which the bonds of various maturity dates may be divided and the number and percentage spreads of the different interest rates which may be bid to apply to such divisions of bonds. The association may require reasonable security for the performance of the contract of purchase of any successful bidder at any public competitive bidding.

Bonds shall be dated, shall bear interest determined as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, and shall be payable as to both principal and interest in such manner as may be determined by the association. The principal of and interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided in Code Section 12-3-212 for such payment.

Bonds shall mature not more than 25 years from the date of such bonds and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the association at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the association in the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 11.)

12-3-202. Revenue bonds - Form; denominations; place of payment of principal and interest; issuance in coupon or registered form.

The association shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest thereon, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the association may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest.

(Ga. L. 1958, p. 61, § 12.)